Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 27
COUNTY SURVEYOR

Sec.

§ 31-2701 — 31-2704. Duties of surveyor — Lands divided by county lines. [Repealed.]

§ 31-2705. Establishment of county lines.

Whenever it shall be ordered by an act of the legislature to establish the boundary line between two (2) counties, the board of county commissioners of each county interested in the boundary shall jointly select and retain the services of a professional land surveyor to establish said boundary line, or each county shall select and retain the services of a professional land surveyor who shall jointly establish said boundary, and firmly plant and mark corners and monuments of imperishable material, also to prepare plats and field notes jointly, one (1) copy of which shall be filed with the auditor and recorder of each of the counties so interested. The fees and compensations for such surveys, plats and field notes, shall be paid out of the county treasury upon the order of the county commissioners of each county to the respective surveyors so employed.

§ 31-2706. County commissioners to procure plats

Copies as evidence. [Repealed.]

§ 31-2707. County surveys to be made by professional land surveyor.

All surveys, maps and plats ordered by the board of county commissioners shall be made by a professional land surveyor retained by the board who shall be paid such fee as may be fixed and agreed upon.

§ 31-2708. Commissioners to furnish blanks and books. [Repealed.]

§ 31-2709. Surveys must conform to United States manual.

No surveys or resurveys hereafter made shall be considered legal evidence in any court within the state, except such surveys as are made in accordance with the United States manual of surveying instructions, the circular on restoration of lost or obliterated corners and subdivisions of sections, issued by the general land office, or by the authority of the United States, the state of Idaho, or by mutual consent of the parties.